Idaho, session 2026, H0563.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-204, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-204. POWERS AND DUTIES. The Idaho state board of accountancy, in
addition to the other powers and duties set forth in this chapter, shall have
the following powers and duties:
(1) To adopt and amend rules, subject to legislative approval, in ac-
cordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code, governing its administration and the enforcement
of this chapter and the conduct of licensees including, but not limited to:
(a) Rules governing the board's meetings and the conduct of its busi-
ness;
(b) Rules of procedure governing the conduct of investigations and
hearings by the board;
(c) Rules specifying the education, examination and experience quali-
fications required for the issuance of certificates, and the continuing
professional education required for renewal of licenses;
(d) Rules of professional conduct directed to controlling the quality
and probity of professional services by licensees, and dealing among
other things with independence, integrity and objectivity; competence
and technical standards; responsibilities to the public; and responsi-
bilities to clients;
(e) Rules governing the professional standards applicable to li-
censees;
(f) Rules governing the manner and circumstances of use of the titles
"certified public accountant" and "licensed public accountant";


(g) Rules regarding peer reviews that may be required to be performed
under the provisions of this chapter;
(h) Rules on reciprocity and substantial equivalency to implement the
provisions of section 54-227 54-210, Idaho Code;
(i) Rules adopting statements on standards as specified in section
54-206, Idaho Code, which, if the board may deem appropriate, shall
be those standards developed for general application by recognized
accountancy organizations such as the AICPA, as such statements are
established from time to time; and
(j) Such other rules as the board may deem necessary or appropriate to
implement or administer the provisions and purposes of this chapter.
(2) To issue original certificates of qualification and licenses to
practice as certified public accountants to such applicants as may be quali-
fied by reciprocity, transfer of examination grades or by examination.
(3) To charge and collect from all applicants, certificate holders, and
licensees such fees as are provided by this chapter and prescribed by rules
of the board.
(4) To initiate or receive complaints, cause the same to be investi-
gated, initiate proceedings, and conduct hearings or proceedings pursuant
to chapter 2, title 54, Idaho Code. The board may designate a member, or any
other person of appropriate competence, to serve as investigating officer to
conduct an investigation. Upon completion of an investigation, the investi-
gating officer shall file a report with the board. Unless dismissed by the
board as unfounded or trivial, the board may proceed with disciplinary pro-
ceedings or may return the report to the investigating officer for further
investigation.
(a) In order to protect the interests of a complainant, witness, third
party or defendant, the board may upon application and for good cause
shown, issue a protective order, consistent with chapter 1, title 74,
Idaho Code, prohibiting the disclosure of specific information other-
wise not privileged and confidential and direct that the proceedings be
conducted so as to implement the order.
(b) In carrying into effect the provisions of this chapter, the board
may subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, and also may re-
quire the submission of books, papers, documents or other pertinent
data; may administer oaths; may take testimony; may cooperate with the
appropriate authorities in other states in investigation and enforce-
ment concerning violations of this chapter and comparable acts of other
states; and may receive evidence in any disciplinary matters or in any
case wherever a violation of the provisions of this chapter is alleged.
Upon failure or refusal to comply with any such order of the board, or
upon failure to honor its subpoena, the board may apply to the court in
the district where the witness resides to enforce compliance.
(5) To authorize by written agreement the division of occupational and
professional licenses as agent to act in its interest.
(6) Any action, claim or demand to recover money damages from the board
or its employees which any person is legally entitled to recover as compensa-
tion for the negligent or otherwise wrongful act or omission of the board or
its employees, when acting within the course and scope of their employment,
shall be governed by the Idaho tort claims act, chapter 9, title 6, Idaho


Code. For purposes of this subsection, the term "employees" shall include
special assignment members of the board and other independent contractors
while acting within the course and scope of their board related work.
(7) All hearings, investigations or proceedings conducted by the board
shall be conducted in conformity with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and
rules of the board adopted pursuant thereto, and, unless otherwise requested
by the concerned party, be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, ti-
tle 74, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-207, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-207. LICENSE -- APPLICATION. (1) Any person desiring a certificate
and license shall make a written application for such certificate and li-
cense to the board, upon forms to be prescribed and furnished by the board.
Such application shall be filed and shall be accompanied by such fee as may be
required by rules of the board.
(2) In addition to meeting the qualifications provided elsewhere in
this chapter, before a certificate and license may be issued, a person
desiring to receive a certificate and license shall have satisfactorily
completed a minimum of one hundred fifty (150) semester hours, or two hundred
twenty-five (225) quarter hours, of college education, with a concentration
in accounting, auditing and business, including a baccalaureate or higher
degree at a college or university acceptable to the board, as established by
rule. Satisfactory evidence in the form of an official transcript received
directly from the school registrar indicating the credits and degree re-
ceived shall be presented to the board to demonstrate successful completion
of these education requirements. one of the following educational pathways:
(3) The board may adopt rules allowing persons who met the education re-
quirements of section 54-208, Idaho Code, when they first sat for the exami-
nation to become licensed even though they do not meet the education require-
ments of this section.
(a) A postbaccalaureate degree conferred by a college or university ac-
ceptable to the board, in an educational program that includes an ac-
counting concentration or equivalent, as specified in subsection (3) of
this section;
(b) A baccalaureate degree plus an additional thirty (30) semester
credit hours, conferred by a college or university acceptable to the
board, in an educational program that includes an accounting concentra-
tion or equivalent as specified in subsection (3) of this section; or
(c) A baccalaureate degree conferred by a college or university accept-
able to the board, in an education program that includes an accounting
concentration or equivalent as specified in subsection (3) of this sec-
tion.
(3) An applicant's education shall be deemed to meet the requirements
of subsection (2) of this section if it meets one (1) of the following condi-
tions:
(a) The applicant has earned a graduate degree with a concentration in
accounting from a program that is accredited in accounting by an accred-
iting agency approved by the board;


(b) The applicant has earned a graduate degree from a program that is
accredited in business by an accrediting agency approved by the board
that includes completion of at least twenty-four (24) semester hours in
accounting, excluding introductory courses, at the undergraduate level
or fifteen (15) semester hours at the graduate level, or an equivalent
combination thereof satisfactory to the board, including coverage of,
but not necessarily separate courses in, the subjects of data analyt-
ics, financial accounting, auditing, taxation, and management account-
ing; or
(c) The applicant has earned a baccalaureate degree at an institution
approved by the board or from a program that is accredited in business by
an accrediting agency approved by the board, including completion of at
least twenty-four (24) semester hours in business, other than account-
ing courses, and twenty-four (24) semester hours or an equivalent com-
bination thereof satisfactory to the board in accounting, excluding in-
troductory courses, that included coverage of, but not necessarily sep-
arate courses in, the subjects of data analytics, financial accounting,
auditing, taxation, and management accounting.
(4) Satisfactory evidence in the form of an official transcript re-
ceived directly from the school registrar indicating the credits and degree
received shall be presented to the board to demonstrate successful comple-
tion of one (1) of the educational pathways identified in subsection (2) of
this section.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-208, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-208. EXAMINATION -- EDUCATION -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) An applicant
for admission to examination as a certified public accountant shall:
(a) Be eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(b) Be of good character;
(c) Be a resident, have been a resident, or intend to immediately become
a resident of the state of Idaho;
(d) (c) Be approved by the board for admission to the examination; and
(e) (d) Provide satisfactory evidence in the form of an official
transcript received directly from the school registrar indicating
successful completion of a baccalaureate degree or its equivalent, the
required credits and courses to be prescribed by the rules of the board.
satisfaction of at least one (1) of the educational requirements set
forth in section 54-207, Idaho Code.
(2) The examination required to be passed as a condition to granting a
certificate shall test the applicant's knowledge of the subjects of account-
ing and auditing, and such other related subjects as the board may specify by
rule, including, but not limited to, business law and taxation. The time for
holding such examination shall be determined by the board and may be changed
from time to time. The board shall prescribe by rule the methods of apply-
ing for and conducting the examination, including methods for grading and
determining a passing grade required of an applicant for a certificate; pro-
vided however, that the board shall endeavor to assure that the examination
itself, grading of the examination, and the passing grades, are uniform with
those of other states. The board may make use of all or any part of the uni-


form certified public accountant examination and advisory grading service
of the AICPA and may contract with third parties to perform such administra-
tive services with respect to the examination as it deems appropriate to as-
sist it in performing its duties hereunder.
(3) The board may charge, or provide for a third party administering the
examination to charge, each applicant a fee, in an amount prescribed by the
board by rule.
(4) None of the education requirements specified in this section shall
apply to an applicant who is a licensed public accountant pursuant to this
chapter.
SECTION 4. That Section 54-209, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-209. EXPERIENCE. (1) An applicant of good character who success-
fully passes the examination, with standards no less than those prescribed
by the board's rules for examination of candidates in Idaho, and who fulfills
the requirements of section 54-207, Idaho Code, shall receive a license as
a certified public accountant if the applicant has completed one (1) year of
experience. the applicable experience requirement as follows:
(a) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate under section
54-207(2)(a) or (b), Idaho Code, shall show that the applicant has had
one (1) year of experience as described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
(b) An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate under section
54-207(2)(c), Idaho Code, shall show that the applicant has had two (2)
years of experience as described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) This The required experience shall include providing any type of
service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, man-
agement advisory, financial advisory, tax or consulting skills, all of which
have been performed under the supervision of and verified by an active li-
censee, meeting requirements prescribed by the board by rule. This experi-
ence may be gained through employment in government, industry, academia or
public practice.
SECTION 5. That Section 54-227, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 2, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-227, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-227. PRACTICE PRIVILEGES. (1) An individual whose principal place
of business is not in the state of Idaho and who holds a valid active license
in good standing as a certified public accountant from any other state shall
have all the practice privileges of licensees of this state without the need
to obtain a license under this chapter, provided that such individual meets
the minimum educational and experience requirements set forth in sections
54-207 and 54-209, Idaho Code.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual identi-
fied in subsection (1) of this section who offers or renders professional


services, whether in person, by mail, telephone, or electronic means, or in
any other way, by this section is granted practice privileges in this state,
and no notice or other submission shall be required of any such individual.
(3) An individual licensed in another state who exercises the practice
privilege afforded under this section and the firm that employs that li-
censee are deemed to simultaneously consent, as a condition of the grant of
this privilege:
(a) To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary
authority of the board;
(b) To comply with the provisions of this chapter and applicable board
rules;
(c) That in the event the license from the state of the individual's
principal place of business is no longer valid, the individual will
cease offering or rendering professional services in this state indi-
vidually and on behalf of a firm; and
(d) To the appointment of the state board that issued the individual's
license as the agent upon whom process may be served in any action or
proceeding by the Idaho board against the licensee.
(4) An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state
and who, as of December 31, 2024, held and continues to hold a valid active
license as a certified public accountant from any state and has practice
privileges in this state pursuant to section 54-227, Idaho Code, as that
section existed on December 31, 2024, shall continue to have all the privi-
leges of a licensee in this state without the need to obtain a license under
sections 54-207 and 54-209, Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.